apertium-scn.scn.dix
    <pardef n="S__battiri">
      <e><p><l>mi</l><r>mi<s n="prn"/><s n="enc"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>mi</l><r>mi<s n="prn"/><s n="enc"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__scrivènnumi"/></e>
      <e><p><l>ni</l><r>ni<s n="prn"/><s n="enc"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ni</l><r>ni<s n="prn"/><s n="enc"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__scrivènnumi"/></e>
      <e><p><l>ti</l><r>ti<s n="prn"/><s n="enc"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ti</l><r>ti<s n="prn"/><s n="enc"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__scrivènnuti"/></e>
      <e><p><l>vi</l><r>vi<s n="prn"/><s n="enc"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>vi</l><r>vi<s n="prn"/><s n="enc"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__scrivènnuti"/></e>
      <e><p><l>cci</l><r>cci<s n="prn"/><s n="enc"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>cci</l><r>cci<s n="prn"/><s n="enc"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sp"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__scurdàrisi"/></e>

      <e><p><l>llu</l><r>lu<s n="prn"/><s n="enc"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>lli</l><r>lu<s n="prn"/><s n="enc"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>lla</l><r>lu<s n="prn"/><s n="enc"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>lli</l><r>lu<s n="prn"/><s n="enc"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      
      <e r="LR"><p><l>lu</l><r>lu<s n="prn"/><s n="enc"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>li</l><r>lu<s n="prn"/><s n="enc"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>la</l><r>lu<s n="prn"/><s n="enc"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>li</l><r>lu<s n="prn"/><s n="enc"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

      <e><p><l>si</l><r>si<s n="prn"/><s n="enc"/><s n="ref"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>si</l><r>si<s n="prn"/><s n="enc"/><s n="ref"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sp"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__scrivènnusi"/></e>

      <e><p><l>ci</l><r>ci<s n="prn"/><s n="enc"/><s n="adv"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>nni</l><r>ni<s n="prn"/><s n="enc"/><s n="adv"/></r></p></e>

      <e><p><l>lu</l><r>lu<s n="prn"/><s n="enc"/><s n="p3"/><s n="nt"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    


    <pardef n="S__scrivennu">
      <e><p><l>mi</l><r>mi<s n="prn"/><s n="enc"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>mi</l><r>mi<s n="prn"/><s n="enc"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__scrivènnumi"/></e>
      <e><p><l>ni</l><r>ni<s n="prn"/><s n="enc"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ni</l><r>ni<s n="prn"/><s n="enc"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__scrivènnumi"/></e>
      <e><p><l>ti</l><r>ti<s n="prn"/><s n="enc"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ti</l><r>ti<s n="prn"/><s n="enc"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__scrivènnuti"/></e>
      <e><p><l>vi</l><r>vi<s n="prn"/><s n="enc"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>vi</l><r>vi<s n="prn"/><s n="enc"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__scrivènnuti"/></e>
      <e><p><l>cci</l><r>cci<s n="prn"/><s n="enc"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>cci</l><r>cci<s n="prn"/><s n="enc"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sp"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__scurdàrisi"/></e>
      
      <e><p><l>lu</l><r>lu<s n="prn"/><s n="enc"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>li</l><r>lu<s n="prn"/><s n="enc"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>la</l><r>lu<s n="prn"/><s n="enc"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>li</l><r>lu<s n="prn"/><s n="enc"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

      <e><p><l>si</l><r>si<s n="prn"/><s n="enc"/><s n="ref"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>si</l><r>si<s n="prn"/><s n="enc"/><s n="ref"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sp"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__scrivènnusi"/></e>

      <e><p><l>lu</l><r>lu<s n="prn"/><s n="enc"/><s n="p3"/><s n="nt"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="ficc/arisi__vblex">
      <e><p><l>ànnu</l><r>arisi<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__scrivennu"/></e>
      <e><p><l>ari</l><r>arisi<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__battiri"/></e>
      <e><p><l>amu</l><r>arisi<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>àmu</l><r>arisi<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__parràmuni"/></e>
      <e><p><l>ati</l><r>arisi<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>àti</l><r>arisi<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__scrìvivi"/></e>
      <e><p><l>a</l><r>arisi<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ate</l><r>arisi<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/><j/>ti<s n="prn"/><s n="enc"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>àssiru</l><r>arisi<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>àssiru</l><r>arisi<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__scrivennu"/></e>
</pardef>



    <pardef n="/c'è__vblex">
      	<e r="LR"><p><l>c'è</l><r>c'è<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      	<e r="RL"><p><l><a/>c'è</l><r>c'è<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      	<e r="LR"><p><l>c'esti</l><r>c'è<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      	<e r="LR"><p><l>nn'è</l><r>c'è<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e> <!--FIXME-->
      	<e r="LR"><p><l>ci<b/>nn'è</l><r>c'è<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e> <!--FIXME-->
      	<e r="LR"><p><l>cci<b/>nn'è</l><r>c'è<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e> <!--FIXME-->
      	<e r="LR"><p><l>cc'è</l><r>c'è<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e> <!--FIXME-->
      	<e r="LR"><p><l>ci<b/>sunnu</l><r>c'è<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      	<e r="LR"><p><l>cci<b/>sunnu</l><r>c'è<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      	<e r="LR"><p><l>ci<b/>sunu</l><r>c'è<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      	<e r="LR" c="Dial/V"><p><l>c'eni</l><r>c'è<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      	<e r="LR"><p><l>nci<b/>su</l><r>c'è<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      	<e r="RL"><p><l><a/>nci<b/>su</l><r>c'è<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="c'è"><i></i><par n="/c'è__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="mmagginarisi"><i>mmaggin</i><par n="ficc/arisi__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="addinucchiarisi"><i>addinucchi</i><par n="ficc/arisi__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="spiciarisi"><i>spici</i><par n="ficc/arisi__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="abbicinarisi"><i>abbicin</i><par n="ficc/arisi__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="curcarisi"><i>curc</i><par n="ficc/arisi__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="assuciarisi"><i>assuci</i><par n="ficc/arisi__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="cuminicarisi"><i>cuminic</i><par n="ficc/arisi__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="lamintarisi"><i>lamint</i><par n="ficc/arisi__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="pricipitarisi"><i>pricipit</i><par n="ficc/arisi__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="immagginarisi"><i>immaggin</i><par n="ficc/arisi__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="lauriarisi"><i>lauri</i><par n="ficc/arisi__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="ciaccarisi"><i>ciacc</i><par n="ficc/arisi__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="fermarisi"><i>ferm</i><par n="ficc/arisi__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="impegnarisi"><par n="im/m"/><i>pegn</i><par n="ficc/arisi__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="'nguaggiarisi"><i>'nguaggi</i><par n="ficc/arisi__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="inclinarisi"><par n="in/n"/><i>clin</i><par n="ficc/arisi__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="prijarisi"><i>prij</i><par n="ficc/arisi__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="figurarisi"><i>figur</i><par n="ficc/arisi__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="imbarcarisi"><i>imbarc</i><par n="ficc/arisi__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="scurdarisi"><i>scurd</i><par n="ficc/arisi__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="separarisi"><i>separ</i><par n="ficc/arisi__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="ambintarisi"><i>ambint</i><par n="ficc/arisi__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="appricarisi"><i>appric</i><par n="ficc/arisi__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="isarisi"><i>is</i><par n="ficc/arisi__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="chiamarisi"><i>chiam</i><par n="ficc/arisi__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="quardarisi"><i>quard</i><par n="ficc/arisi__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="spusarisi"><i>spus</i><par n="ficc/arisi__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="procurarisi"><i>procur</i><par n="ficc/arisi__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="sbrigarisi"><i>sbrig</i><par n="ficc/arisi__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="cunfarisi"><i>cunf</i><par n="ficc/arisi__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="ancrignarisi"><i>ancrign</i><par n="ficc/arisi__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="assicurarisi"><i>assicur</i><par n="ficc/arisi__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="ribbellarisi"><par n="ri/re"/><i>bbell</i><par n="ficc/arisi__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="dedicarisi"><i>dedic</i><par n="ficc/arisi__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="prisintarisi"><i>prisint</i><par n="ficc/arisi__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="addunarisi"><i>addun</i><par n="ficc/arisi__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="beffarisi"><i>beff</i><par n="ficc/arisi__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="affrittarisi"><i>affritt</i><par n="ficc/arisi__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="ammazzarisi"><i>ammazz</i><par n="ficc/arisi__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="preoccuparisi"><i>preoccup</i><par n="ficc/arisi__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="ricudarisi"><par n="ri/re"/><i>cud</i><par n="ficc/arisi__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="canciarisi"><i>canci</i><par n="ficc/arisi__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="inchinarisi"><par n="in/n"/><i>chin</i><par n="ficc/arisi__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="spugghiarisi"><i>spugghi</i><par n="ficc/arisi__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="impirugghiarisi"><par n="im/m"/><i>pirugghi</i><par n="ficc/arisi__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="'ncagnarisi"><i>'ncagn</i><par n="ficc/arisi__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="scuntrarisi"><i>scuntr</i><par n="ficc/arisi__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="priarisi"><i>pri</i><par n="ficc/arisi__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="fidarisi"><i>fid</i><par n="ficc/arisi__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="burlarisi"><i>burl</i><par n="ficc/arisi__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="piegarisi"><i>pieg</i><par n="ficc/arisi__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="annigarisi"><i>annig</i><par n="ficc/arisi__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="dilettarisi"><i>dilett</i><par n="ficc/arisi__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="ajutarisi"><i>ajut</i><par n="ficc/arisi__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="arraggiarisi"><i>arraggi</i><par n="ficc/arisi__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="stancarisi"><i>stanc</i><par n="ficc/arisi__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="rivelarisi"><par n="ri/re"/><i>vel</i><par n="ficc/arisi__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="sistimarisi"><i>sistim</i><par n="ficc/arisi__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="rivutarisi"><par n="ri/re"/><i>vut</i><par n="ficc/arisi__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="'ngrupparisi"><i>'ngrupp</i><par n="ficc/arisi__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="'mmuscarisi"><i>'mmusc</i><par n="ficc/arisi__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="assittarisi"><i>assitt</i><par n="ficc/arisi__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="sullivarisi"><i>sulliv</i><par n="ficc/arisi__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="nausiarisi"><i>nausi</i><par n="ficc/arisi__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="cumunicarisi"><i>cumunic</i><par n="ficc/arisi__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="arricriarisi"><i>arricri</i><par n="ficc/arisi__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="stinnicchiarisi"><i>stinnicchi</i><par n="ficc/arisi__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="avvirarisi"><i>avvir</i><par n="ficc/arisi__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="spassiarisi"><i>spassi</i><par n="ficc/arisi__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="abbigghiarisi"><i>abbigghi</i><par n="ficc/arisi__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="bifurcarisi"><i>bifurc</i><par n="ficc/arisi__vblex"/></e>
